Hawaii statutes.
[§634-38] Manner of service within the
State; assumpsit. For civil actions in the nature of assumpsit, when
service of summons is required by law, court rule, or court order, service on
the defendant within the State shall be:

(1) By personal delivery by a person authorized to
serve process; or

(2) If a reasonable attempt at personal delivery has
not been successful, then by certified, registered, or express mail sent to the
addressee only, as ordered by the court.

Service pursuant to paragraph (1) and proof of
personal service shall be made in the manner prescribed by law, court rule, or
court order. If service is made pursuant to paragraph (2), a return receipt or
other proof of service provided by the postal service shall be filed showing
delivery to the addressee within the State. [L 2014, c 41, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next